Wyoming, session 2026, SF0020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-21-201 and 9-21-202 are created to
read:
ARTICLE 2
DATA PRIVACY-GOVERNMENT ENTITIES
9-21-201. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot
reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise
be linked to, an identified or identifiable natural person
or personal digital identity or a device linked to a
natural person or personal digital identity;
(ii) "Government entity" means the state and all
its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities and
institutions and any local government entity. "Government
entity" shall not include the judicial branch of government
or any law enforcement agency in Wyoming;
(iii) "Identified or identifiable natural
person" means a natural person who can be readily
identified, directly or indirectly, by reference to an
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
identifier such as a name, an identification number,
specific geolocation data or an online identifier;
(iv) "Law enforcement agency" means a county,
municipal, college or university police force, Wyoming
highway patrol, the division of criminal investigation, the
department of corrections, the game and fish department
when acting within its law enforcement capacity or any
state or local agency or political subdivision or part of
an agency or political subdivision to the extent that the
primary purpose of the agency or political subdivision, or
part thereof, is the prevention or investigation of crime
or the enforcement of penal, traffic, regulatory or
criminal laws. "Law enforcement agency" shall not include
the office of any city, county or district attorney or
other division of the attorney general;
(v) "Personal data" means information that is
linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or
identifiable natural person or personal digital identity
and does not include deidentified data;
(vi) "Personal digital identity" means as
defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xviii).
9-21-202. Limitations on personal data by government
entities; conflict of laws.
(a) No government entity shall purchase, sell, trade
or transfer personal data without the express written
consent of the natural person whom the personal data
references except as otherwise expressly provided by law
and except that:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) A government entity may transfer personal
data to another government entity provided that the other
government entity complies with this article;
(ii) A government entity may transfer personal
data to a nongovernment entity contracted by the government
entity to provide or assist with government services
provided by the government entity. Any contract for
services with a nongovernment entity shall include
requirements for the protection of personal data consistent
with this article. Any personal data transferred pursuant
to this paragraph shall be returned or destroyed by the
nongovernment entity once the personal data is no longer
necessary for the provision of the government service. No
nongovernment entity shall maintain, sell, transfer,
process or otherwise use the personal data in any manner
except as necessary to provide the contracted service;
(iii) A government entity may petition the
elected governing person or body with authority over the
government entity for an exception to this subsection on a
case by case basis. The elected governing person or body,
in the elected governing person's or body's discretion, may
publicly approve in writing an exception to this subsection
not to exceed a term of two (2) years per petition; and
(iv) Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to prohibit the transfer of personal data that is
transferrable pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act or the Family Education Rights and
Privacy Act.
(b) Any current or former Wyoming resident or the
resident's legally authorized representative may request a
copy of their personal data from any government entity
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
maintaining it. The government entity may charge a fee for
production of the requested personal data consistent with
fees authorized to be charged under the Wyoming Public
Records Act, W.S. 16-4-201 through 16-4-205.
(c) A current or former Wyoming resident or the
resident's legally authorized representative who objects to
the accuracy, completeness, pertinence, timeliness,
relevance, retention, dissemination or denial of access to
the resident's own personal data that is maintained by a
government entity may, individually or through a duly
authorized representative, file an objection with the
government entity that maintains the data. The government
entity maintaining the personal data shall, within sixty
(60) days of the receipt of an objection:
(i) Verify the identity of the current or former
Wyoming resident or the resident's legally authorized
representative who filed the objection with the government
entity;
(ii) Review the validity of the objection;
(iii) If the objection is found to be
meritorious after review, alter the contents of, or the
methods for holding, or the dissemination or use of the
personal data, or delete or grant access to it;
(iv) If the objection is found to lack merit
after review, provide the resident the opportunity to have
a statement reflecting the resident's views maintained with
the personal data in question;
(v) Notify the resident in writing of any
decision regarding the resident's objection.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) To the extent that a provision of this article
conflicts with another provision of state or federal law,
the other provision shall control. Nothing in this article
shall be construed to abrogate any disclosure of data or
public records under the Wyoming Public Records Act, W.S.
16-4-201 through 16-4-205.
Section 2. W.S. 9-21-203 is created to read:
9-21-203. Personal data collection and retention by
government entities.
(a) In addition to the policies required under W.S.
9-21-101, if applicable, each government entity that
collects or retains personal data shall adopt, enforce and
maintain a policy regarding the collection, access,
retention, security and use of personal data consistent
with all applicable federal and state laws, including this
article.
(b) No government entity shall collect or maintain
more personal data than is reasonably necessary for the
performance of the government entity's lawful functions.
All personal data collected and maintained by government
entities shall be necessary for a specific purpose
identified in the adopted policies of the government
entity.
(c) No government entity shall maintain personal data
for longer than three (3) years without a written policy
identifying the extended retention period and providing a
reasonable justification for the extended retention period.
Statutory retention requirements provided for in W.S.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
9-2-405 through 9-2-413 constitute a reasonable
justification.
(d) A government entity to which the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act or the Family Education
Rights and Privacy Act applies that is compliant with a
written data collection and retention policy that meets the
requirements of the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act or the Family Education Rights and
Privacy Act shall be deemed compliant with this section.
Section 3. Not later than January 1, 2027, the state
chief information officer in consultation with the state
archivist shall develop sample policies for use by all
government entities as defined by W.S. 9-21-201(a)(ii).
Section 4. W.S. 9-21-203 as created by section 2 of
this act shall be effective as to counties, cities, public
institutions of higher education or towns on July 1, 2028
and as to each political subdivision of the state other
than state agencies, counties, cities, public institutions
of higher education or towns on July 1, 2029. All
government entities as defined by W.S. 9-21-201(a)(ii)
shall adopt any necessary policies and procedures to meet
the requirements of this act.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0020
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 5.
(a) Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2027.
(b) Sections 1, 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
7